Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1064.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; department of transportation; U.S. Route 66; improvements; intergovernmental agreement A. The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for distribution to the city of Flagstaff as provided in subsection B of this section to design and construct improvements along U.S. Route 66 between Interstate 40 and Milton Road. B. On or before September 15, 2026, the department of transportation shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the city of Flagstaff to design and construct the improvements along U.S. Route 66. If the city of Flagstaff enters into the intergovernmental agreement, the monies appropriated by this section shall be distributed to the city of Flagstaff on or before November 1, 2026.